Utah statutes.
63G-12-304.   Voluntary registration by private employer certifying participation in verification.

(1) (a)  On or after the program start date, a private employer may register with the department certifying that the private employer is in compliance with Subsection 63G-12-301(2).

(b)  A private employer may register with the department under this section regardless of whether the private employer is required to comply with Subsection 63G-12-301(2).

(2)  To register or renew a registration with the department under this part, a private employer shall:

(a)  file a registration statement with the department that certifies compliance with Subsection 63G-12-301(2); and

(b)  pay a fee established by the department in accordance Section 63J-1-504 that reflects the cost of registering employers under this section and publishing the list described in Subsection (5).

(3)  A registration under this part expires every two years on the anniversary of the day on which the registration is filed with the department.

(4)  In accordance with Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules to provide for:

(a)  the form of a registration statement under this section;

(b)  the process of filing a registration statement under this section; and

(c)  the process of renewing a registration statement under this section.

(5)  On and after the program start date, the department shall publish electronically a list of private employers who register under this section on a website accessible to the general public without a charge.

(6)  The department shall coordinate with the Department Commerce to transfer the registration operated by the Department of Commerce to the department effective on the program start date.



Enacted by Chapter 18, 2011 General Session

